Utah statutes.
59-8-106.   Rulemaking authority.
The commission is charged with the administration and enforcement of this
chapter and may promulgate such rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, the Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act as may be required to effectuate the purposes of
this chapter.
